Utah statutes.
53A-17a-157.   Teacher Salary Supplement Restricted Account.
(1)  There is created within the Uniform School Fund a restricted account
known as the "Teacher Salary Supplement Restricted Account."
(2)  The account shall be funded from appropriations made to the account by
the Legislature.
(3)  The account shall be used to fund teacher salary supplements for school
districts and charter schools as provided in Section 53A-17a-156.
(4)  The Division of Finance shall distribute account money to school
districts and charter schools for the Teacher Salary Supplement Program as
provided in Section 53A-17a-156.
